Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5796YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.446, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. A child under one year of age and weighing less 3 than twenty pounds who is being transported in a motor 4 vehicle subject to registration, except a school bus or 5 motorcycle, shall be secured during transit in a rear-facing 6 child restraint system , that is used in accordance with the 7 manufacturerâs instructions , until the child reaches the age of 8 two or exceeds the manufacturerâs recommended maximum height 9 and weight limits for the system . 10 b. A child under six years of age who does not meet the 11 description in paragraph âaâ and who is being transported 12 in a motor vehicle subject to registration, except a school 13 bus or motorcycle, shall be secured during transit by a 14 child restraint system , that is used in accordance with the 15 manufacturerâs instructions , until the child reaches the age of 16 eight . 17 2. A child at least six eight years of age but under 18 eighteen years of age who is being transported in a motor 19 vehicle subject to registration, except a school bus or 20 motorcycle, shall be secured during transit by a child 21 restraint system , that is used in accordance with the 22 manufacturerâs instructions , or by a safety belt or safety 23 harness of a type approved under section 321.445 , until the 24 child reaches the age of eighteen . 25 Sec. 2. Section 321.446, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 26 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 27